Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 10

Uniform Simultaneous Death Act

Subchapter 1

— Uniform Simultaneous Death Act

28-10-101 — 28-10-112. [Repealed.]

28-10-201. Definitions.

In this subchapter:

“Co-owners with right of survivorship” includes joint tenants, tenants by the entireties, and other co-owners of property or accounts held under circumstances that entitle one (1) or more to the whole of the property or account on the death of the other or others.

“Governing instrument” means a deed, will, trust, insurance or annuity policy, account with POD designation, pension, profit-sharing, retirement, or similar benefit plan, instrument creating or exercising a power of appointment or a power of attorney, or a dispositive, appointive, or nominative instrument of any similar type.

“Payor” means a trustee, insurer, business entity, employer, government, governmental agency, subdivision, or instrumentality, or any other person authorized or obligated by law or a governing instrument to make payments.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2005 Arkansas General Assembly, Probate Law, 28 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 399.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 74, § 1.

28-10-202. Requirement of survival by 120 hours under probate code.

Except as provided in §28-10-206, if the title to property, the devolution of property, the right to elect an interest in property, or the right to exempt property, homestead or family allowance depends upon an individual's survivorship of the death of another individual, an individual who is not established by clear and convincing evidence to have survived the other individual by 120 hours is deemed to have predeceased the other individual. This section does not apply if its application would result in a taking of intestate estate by the state.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 74, § 1.

28-10-203. Requirement of survival by 120 hours under governing instruments.

Except as provided in §28-10-206, for purposes of a provision of a governing instrument that relates to an individual surviving an event, including the death of another individual, an individual who is not established by clear and convincing evidence to have survived the event by 120 hours is deemed to have predeceased the event.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 74, § 1.

28-10-204. Co-owners with right of survivorship — Requirement of survival by 120 hours.

Except as provided in §28-10-206, if: (i) it is not established by clear and convincing evidence that one of two co-owners with right of survivorship survived the other co-owner by 120 hours, one-half of the property passes as if one had survived by 120 hours and one-half as if the other had survived by 120 hours and (ii) there are more than two co-owners and it is not established by clear and convincing evidence that at least one of them survived the others by 120 hours, the property passes in the proportion that one bears to the whole number of co-owners.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 74, § 1.

28-10-205. Evidence of death or status.

In addition to the rules of evidence in courts of general jurisdiction, the following rules relating to a determination of death and status apply:

Death occurs when an individual has sustained either: (1) irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory functions or (2) irreversible cessation of all functions of the entire brain, including the brain stem. A determination of death must be made in accordance with accepted medical standards.

A certified or authenticated copy of a death certificate purporting to be issued by an official or agency of the place where the death purportedly occurred is prima facie evidence of the fact, place, date, and time of death and the identity of the decedent.

A certified or authenticated copy of any record or report of a governmental agency, domestic or foreign, that an individual is missing, detained, dead, or alive is prima facie evidence of the status and of the dates, circumstances, and places disclosed by the record or report.

In the absence of prima facie evidence of death under paragraph (2) or (3), the fact of death may be established by clear and convincing evidence, including circumstantial evidence.

An individual whose death is not established under the preceding paragraphs who is absent for a continuous period of five years, during which he or she has not been heard from, and whose absence is not satisfactorily explained after diligent search or inquiry, is presumed to be dead. His or her death is presumed to have occurred at the end of the period unless there is sufficient evidence for determining that death occurred earlier.

In the absence of evidence disputing the time of death stipulated on a document described in paragraph (2) or (3), a document described in paragraph (2) or (3) that stipulates a time of death 120 hours or more after the time of death of another individual, however the time of death of the other individual is determined, establishes by clear and convincing evidence that the individual survived the other individual by 120 hours.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 74, § 1.

28-10-206. Exceptions.

This subchapter does not apply if:

the governing instrument contains language dealing explicitly with simultaneous deaths or deaths in a common disaster and that language is operable under the facts of the case;

the governing instrument expressly indicates that an individual is not required to survive an event, including the death of another individual, by any specified period or expressly requires the individual to survive the event for a specified period;

the imposition of 120-hour requirement of survival would cause a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment to be invalid under any rule against perpetuities; or

the application of a 120-hour requirement of survival to multiple governing instruments would result in an unintended failure or duplication of a disposition.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Section 6 of the Uniform Simultaneous Death Act (ULA 1993) begins as follows:

“Survival by 120 hours is not required if:”

Amendments. The 2007 amendment substituted “any rule against perpetuities” for “the Rule Against Perpetuities” in (3).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 74, § 1; 2007, No. 240, § 4.

28-10-207. Protection of payors, bona fide purchasers, and other third parties — Personal liability of recipient.

A payor or other third party is not liable for having made a payment or transferred an item of property or any other benefit to a person designated in a governing instrument who, under this subchapter, is not entitled to the payment or item of property, or for having taken any other action in good faith reliance on the person's apparent entitlement under the terms of the governing instrument, before the payor or other third party received written notice of a claimed lack of entitlement under this subchapter. A payor or other third party is liable for a payment made or other action taken after the payor or other third party received written notice of a claimed lack of entitlement under this subchapter.

Written notice of a claimed lack of entitlement under paragraph 1 must be mailed to the payor's or other third party's main office or home by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, or served upon the payor or other third party in the same manner as a summons in a civil action. Upon receipt of written notice of a claimed lack of entitlement under this subchapter, a payor or other third party may pay any amount owed or transfer or deposit any item of property held by it to or with the court having jurisdiction of the probate proceedings relating to the decedent's estate, or if no proceedings have been commenced, to or with the court having jurisdiction of probate proceedings relating to decedents' estates located in the county of the decedent's residence. The court shall hold the funds or item of property and, upon its determination under this subchapter, shall order disbursement in accordance with the determination. Payments, transfers, or deposits made to or with the court discharge the payor or other third party from all claims for the value of amounts paid to or items of property transferred to or deposited with the court.

A person who purchases property for value and without notice, or who receives a payment or other item of property in partial or full satisfaction of a legally enforceable obligation, is neither obligated under this subchapter to return the payment, item of property, or benefit nor liable under this subchapter for the amount of the payment or the value of the item of property or benefit. But a person who, not for value, receives a payment, item of property, or any other benefit to which the person is not entitled under this subchapter is obligated to return the payment, item of property, or benefit, or is personally liable for the amount of the payment or the value of the item of property or benefit, to the person who is entitled to it under this subchapter.

If this subchapter or any part of this subchapter is preempted by federal law with respect to a payment, an item of property, or any other benefit covered by this subchapter, a person who, not for value, receives the payment, item of property, or any other benefit to which the person is not entitled under this subchapter is obligated to return the payment, item of property, or benefit, or is personally liable for the amount of the payment or the value of the item of property or benefit, to the person who would have been entitled to it were this subchapter or part of this subchapter not preempted.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 74, § 1.

28-10-208. Uniformity of application and construction.

This subchapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this subchapter among states enacting it.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 74, § 1.

28-10-209. Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Uniform Simultaneous Death Act (2005)”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 74, § 1.

28-10-210. [Reserved.]

A.C.R.C. Notes. Section 10 of the Uniform Simultaneous Death Act (ULA 1993), a repealing section, was not adopted in Arkansas.

28-10-211. Severability clause.

If any provision of this subchapter or its application to any persons or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the subchapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this subchapter are severable.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 74, § 1.

28-10-212. Effective date.

This subchapter takes effect January 1, 2006.

On the effective date of this subchapter:

an act done before the effective date in any proceeding and any accrued right is not impaired by this subchapter. If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period of time that has commenced to run by the provisions of any statute before the effective date, the provisions remain in force with respect to that right; and

any rule of construction or presumption provided in this subchapter applies to instruments executed and multiple-party accounts opened before the effective date unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent.

Am. Jur. 25 Am. Jur. 2d, Dower, § 1 et seq.

Ark. L. Rev.

Real Property — Requirement of Seisin as Basis for Award of Dower, 4 Ark. L. Rev. 246.

Real Property — Dower — Vesting of Title to Realty in Heirs of Intestate, 6 Ark. L. Rev. 67.

Medieval Law in the Age of Space: Some “Rules of Property” in Arkansas, 22 Ark. L. Rev. 248.

The New Arkansas Inheritance Laws: A Step into the Present with an Eye to the Future, 23 Ark. L. Rev. 313.

Estate Planning with Disclaimers in Arkansas, 27 Ark. L. Rev. 411.

C.J.S. 28 C.J.S., Dower & Curtesy, § 1 et seq.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Brantley and Effland, Inheritance, The Share of the Surviving Spouse, and Wills: Arkansas Law and the Uniform Probate Code Compared, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 361.

Note, Property — Dower — Specific Performance Is Allowed. Box v. Dudeck, 265 Ark. 165, 578 S.W.2d 567 (1979), 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 495.

Note, Constitutional Law — Equal Protection — Arkansas' Gender-Based Statutes on Dower, Election, Statutory Allowances, and Homestead Are Unconstitutional, Hess v. Wims, 272 Ark. 43, 613 S.W.2d 85 (1981); Stokes v. Stokes, 271 Ark. 300, 613 S.W.2d 372, 18 A.L.R.4th 903 (1981), 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 361.

Legislative Survey, Decedents' Estates, 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 591.

Survey of Arkansas Law, Decedents' Estates, 5 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 135.

Cathey, The Real Estate Installment Sale Contract: Its Drafting, Use, Enforcement, and Consequences, 5 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 229.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

J. Cliff McKinney, With All My Worldly Goods I Thee Endow: The Law and Statistics of Dower and Curtesy in Arkansas, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 353 (2016).

Effective Dates. Acts 1981, No. 714, § 75: Mar. 25, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to such matters as homestead, dower, curtesy, statutory allowances payable from a decedent's estate, and the right of a surviving spouse to take against the will of a decedent, do not in all circumstances provide for equal treatment between the sexes, that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides equality in the property rights and interests of married persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

History.

Acts 2005, No. 74, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Uniform Simultaneous Death Act (2005)